apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSSESSIVES. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}n%{ъ%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{I%}n%{ъ%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}n%{ъ%}%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{I%}n%{ъ%}%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;

! This is how it was before:
!%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSSESSIVES ;
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:l%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-MEN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SEN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-OL

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:l # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:nın%{ъ%} # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:g%{ъ%}an # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-BIZ

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SIZ

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-OLAR

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>g%{ъ%}a # ;

LEXICON PRON-XXX ! To categorise

%<prn%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}nsh%{I%} # ;             
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}nsh%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>nsh%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}nsh%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!======================!
 LEXICON ModalParticles
!======================!

ma:%~ma QST ; ! "" Dir/RL
ma:ma QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
! мa:бa QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
! мa:пa QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
! мa:мe QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
! мa:бe QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
! мa:пe QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ma% ne:%~ma% ne QST ; ! "" Dir/RL
ma% ne:ma% ne QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
! мa% нe:мe% нe QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
! шe:шe QST ; ! ""

! ғoй:%~ғoй MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/RL
! ғoй:ғoй MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/LR
! ғoй:қoй MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/LR

!====================!
 LEXICON Conjunctions
!====================!

da:%~da CC ; ! "" ! Dir/RL
da:da CC ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
da:de CC ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
tu%'we:tu%'we CC ; ! ""

!! Прoтивитeльныe

al:al CC ; ! "contrastive and"
biraq:biraq CC ; ! "but"
tek:tek CC ; ! "but, just"

birese:birese CC ; ! ""
ha%'m:ha%'m CC ; ! ""
ja%'ne:ja%'ne CC ; ! ""
menen:menen CC ; ! ""
penen:penen CC ; ! ""
sonday%-aq:sonday%-aq CC ; ! ""
ya:ya CC ; ! ""
yamasa:yamasa CC ; ! ""
yaki:yaki CC ; ! ""


eger:eger CS ; ! ""
egerde:egerde CS ; ! ""
ma%'bada:ma%'bada CS ; ! ""
o%'ytkeni:o%'ytkeni CS ; ! ""
onda:onda CS ; ! ""
onday% bolsa:onday% bolsa CS ; ! ""
sebebi:sebebi CS ; ! ""
yag%'nıy:yag%'nıy CS ; ! ""

! Adverbial conjunctions = "Отнoситeльныe слoвa"
! ==============================================

! aйтуыншa:aйтуыншa CA ; ! ""
! aлaйдa:aлaйдa CA ; ! "nevertheless"
! әйтпeсe:әйтпeсe CA ; ! ""
! әйтсe% дe:әйтсe% дe CA ; ! "nevertheless"
! бaсқaшa% aйткaндa:бaсқaшa% aйткaндa CA ; ! ""
! дeгeнмeн:дeгeнмeн CA ; ! "nevertheless"
! жaзуыншa:жaзуыншa CA ; ! ""
! мәлімдeуіншe:мәлімдeуіншe CA ; ! ""
! oндықтaн:oндықтaн CA ; ! "that is why"
usı% sebepten:usı% sebepten CA ; ! "therefore"
! пікіріншe:пікіріншe CA ; ! ""
! сoндa% дa:сoндa% дa CA ; ! "nevertheless" Use/MT   = (tat) шулaй дa
! сoндa:сoндa CA ; ! "nevertheless"                  = (tat) шулaй дa
sonlıqtan:sonlıqtan CA ; ! "that is why"
! сөздeріншe:сөздeріншe CA ; ! ""
! сөзіншe:сөзіншe CA ; ! ""
! сөйтсe% дe:сөйтсe% дe CA ; ! "nevertheless"
! сөйтсe:сөйтсe CA ; ! "nevertheless"
! хaбaрлaуыншa:хaбaрлaуыншa CA ; ! ""

!===================!
 LEXICON Postadverbs
!===================!

%-aq:%-aq POSTADV ; ! ""

g%'ana:%~g%'ana POSTADV ; ! Dir/RL
g%'ana:g%'ana POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR
g%'ana:qana POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR

da:%~da POSTADV ; ! "1. even if"     Dir/RL
da:da POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
da:de POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
da:ta POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
da:te POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR

tag%'ı POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too" ! FIXME:CHECK pos
tegis POSTADV ; ! "entirely/all/all together"

!===================!
 LEXICON Pronouns
!===================!

PersonalPronouns ;

DemonstrativePronouns ;

InterrogativePronouns ;

basqalar:basqalar PRON-IND-PL; ! "other"
birdeme:birdeme PRON-IND ; ! "something"
bir% na%'rse:bir% na%'rse PRON-IND ; ! "something" Use/MT
gey:gey PRON-IND ; ! "some" FIXME CHECK
geypara:geypara PRON-IND ; ! "some" FIXME CHECK
ha%'r:ha%'r PRON-IND ; ! !"either" Use/MT 
birew:birew PRON-IND ; ! !"someone" Use/MT 

barlıq:barlıq PRON-QNT ; ! ""
ba%'ri:ba%'ri PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! "everyone"  ! FIXME: in the end, this really shouldn't create <px*> tags too (same problem for kymorph)
ba%'rshe:ba%'rshe PRON-QNT ; ! ""
! бәрі PRON-IND ; ! "everyone"  !!! This is an alternate of below ! FIXME: true for Kazakh too?
birew:birew PRON-QNT ; ! ""
bir% qatar:bir% qatar PRON-QNT ; !
ekew:ekew PRON-QNT ; ! "both" !Use/MT
geybirew:geybirew PRON-QNT ; ! 
ha%'mme:ha%'mme PRON-QNT ; ! 
ha%'r% kim:ha%'r% kim PRON-QNT ; ! ""
ko%'bisi:ko%'bisi PRON-QNT ; ! "most" !Use/MT

hesh% kim:hesh% kim PRNNEG ; ! ""
hesh% na%'rse:hesh% na%'rse PRNNEG ; ! "" Use/MT
heshten%'e:heshten%'e PRNNEG ; ! ""

bir%-bir:bir%-bir PRON-RECIP ; ! "each other, one another"

o%'z:o%'z PRON-REF ; ! "self"

basqa:basqa PRON-XXX ; ! ""

 LEXICON Postpositions
arqalı:arqalı POST ; ! ""
arnalg%'an:arnalg%'an POST ; ! ""
alısıraq:alısıraq POST ; ! ""
basqa:basqa POST ; ! ""
beri:beri POST ; ! ""
berli:berli POST ; ! ""
beter:beter POST ; ! ""
birge:birge POST ; ! ""
boyı:boyı POST ; ! ""
boyı% menen:boyı% menen POST ; ! ""
boyında:boyında POST ; ! ""
boyınsha:boyınsha POST ; ! ""
burın:burın POST ; ! ""
ko%'re:ko%'re POST ; ! ""
qurlı:qurlı POST ; ! ""
deyin:deyin POST ; ! ""
haqqında:haqqında POST ; ! ""
jo%'ninde:jo%'ninde POST ; ! ""
jaqın:jaqın POST ; ! ""
ibarat:ibarat POST ; ! ""
ilgeri:ilgeri POST ; ! ""
uqsas:uqsas POST ; ! ""
qabat:qabat POST ; ! ""
qarag%'anda:qarag%'anda POST ; ! ""
qaray:qaray POST ; ! ""
qaramag%'ında:qaramag%'ında POST ; ! ""
qaramag%'ındag%'ı:qaramag%'ındag%'ı POST ; ! ""
qaramay:qaramay POST ; ! ""
qaramastan:qaramastan POST ; ! ""
qarsı:qarsı POST ; ! ""
qatar:qatar POST ; ! ""
keyin:keyin POST ; ! ""
keyinshelik:keyinshelik POST ; ! "" FIXME not sure if its POST
keyinirek:keyinirek POST ; ! "" FIXME not sure if its POST
birge:birge POST ; ! ""
qurlı:qurlı POST ; ! ""
maqsetınde:maqsetınde POST ; ! ""
muwapıq:muwapıq POST ; ! ""
penen:penen POST ; ! ""
sayın:sayın POST ; ! ""
sa%'ykes:sa%'ykes POST ; ! ""
shama% menen:shama% menen POST ; ! ""
shekem:shekem POST ; ! ""
sıyaqlı:sıyaqlı POST ; ! ""
tısqarı:tısqarı POST ; ! ""
tuwralı:tuwralı POST ; ! ""
ushın:ushın POST ; ! ""
uzag%'ıraq:uzag%'ıraq POST ; ! ""
men:%{M%}en POST ; ! "with" + NOM
men:%{M%}enen POST ; ! "with" + NOM ! Dir/LR
men:ben POST ; ! "with" + NOM       ! Dir/LR
men:men POST ; ! "with" + NOM       ! Dir/LR
men:pen POST ; ! "with" + NOM       ! Dir/LR
 LEXICON Numerals
nol:nol NUM ; ! ""
bir:bir NUM ; ! ""
eki:eki NUM ; ! ""
u%'sh:u%'sh NUM ; ! ""
to%'rt:to%'rt NUM ; ! ""
bes:bes NUM ; ! ""
altı:altı NUM ; ! ""
jeti:jeti NUM ; ! ""
segiz:segiz NUM ; ! ""
tog%'ız:tog%'ız NUM ; ! ""
on:on NUM ; ! ""
on% bir:on% bir NUM ; ! ""
on% eki:on% eki NUM ; ! ""
on% u%'sh:on% u%'sh NUM ; ! ""
on% to%'rt:on% to%'rt NUM ; ! ""
on% bes:on% bes NUM ; ! ""
on% altı:on% altı NUM ; ! ""
on% jeti:on% jeti NUM ; ! ""
on% segiz:on% segiz NUM ; ! ""
on% tog%'ız:on% tog%'ız NUM ; ! ""
jigirma:jigirma NUM-TWENTY ; ! "twenty"
otız:otız NUM ; ! ""
qırıq:qırıq NUM ; ! ""
eliw:eliw NUM ; ! ""
alpıs:alpıs NUM ; ! ""
jetpis:jetpis NUM ; ! ""
seksen:seksen NUM ; ! ""
toqsan:toqsan NUM ; ! ""
ju%'z:ju%'z NUM ; ! ""
mın%':mın%' NUM ; ! ""
on% mın%':on% mın%' NUM ; ! ""
million:million NUM ; ! ""
milliard:milliard NUM ; ! ""
trillion:trillion NUM ; ! ""
bir:birew NUM-COLL ;
eki:ekew NUM-COLL ;
u%'sh:u%'shew NUM-COLL ;
to%'rt:to%'rtew NUM-COLL ;
bes:besew NUM-COLL ;
altı:altaw NUM-COLL ;
jeti:jetew NUM-COLL ;
I:I NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV:IV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII:VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
X:X NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIV:XIV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XV:XV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVIII:XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
neshe:neshe NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON Adverbs
qayda:qayda ADV-ITG ; ! "where (гдe;кудa)"
qalay:qalay ADV-ITG ; ! "how"
qashan:qashan ADV-ITG ; ! "when"
ne:ne ADV-ITG ; ! "what" Use/MT
